North Carolina, session 2025, HB145.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina the sum of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to the University of North
Carolina at Chapel Hill (UNC-CH) to develop a diabetes research institute at UNC-CH.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H145-v-1*